Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 352.313 is amended to read:
352.313. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Active  member of the Armed Forces of the United States” includes officers and enlisted
personnel of the Armed Forces of the United States who:
(A) Reside in this state while assigned to duty at any  base, station, shore establishment or other
facility in this state;
(B) Reside in this state  while serving as members of the crew of a ship that has an Oregon port
or shore establishment as its home port or permanent station; [ or]
(C) Reside in another state or  a foreign country and establish Oregon residency by filing Oregon
state income taxes no later than 12 months before leaving active duty ; or
(D) Reside in another state and are members of the Oregon National Guard .
(b) “Armed Forces of the United States” includes:
(A) The Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps and Coast Guard of the United States;
(B) Reserve components of  the Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps and Coast Guard of the
United States; and
(C) The National Guard of the United States and the Oregon National Guard.
(c) “Dependent children” includes any children of  an active member of the Armed Forces of the
United States, of an active member of the  commissioned corps of the National Oceanic and Atmo-
spheric Administration or of  a member of the Public Health Service of the United States Department
of Health and Human Services detailed by proper authority for duty with the Army or  Navy of the
United States, who:
(A) Are under 18 years of age and not married, otherwise emancipated or self-supporting; or
(B) Are under 23 years of  age, unmarried, enrolled in a full-time course of study in an institution
of higher learning and dependent on the member for over one-half of their support.
(2) Active members of the Armed Forces of the United States, active members of the  commis-
sioned corps of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration and members of  the Public
Health Service of  the United States Department of Health and Human Services detailed by proper
authority for duty with the Army or Navy of the United States, and their  spouses and dependent
children, are considered residents of this state for the purpose of admission  and for the purpose of
Enrolled Senate Bill 798 (SB 798-INTRO) Page 1
determining fees and tuition to be  paid by such individuals while attending any public university
listed in ORS 352.002.
(3) The governing board  of a public university listed in ORS 352.002 may contract with the
Armed Forces of the United States to furnish educational service to active members of the  Armed
Forces of the United States.
(4) The governing board shall determine the number of such students that should  be accepted
and shall make final decisions on admission of individual applicants.
(5) Students attending the public universities under contracts with the Armed Forces  of the
United States under this section shall pay fees and tuition customarily charged Oregon students.
(6) Payments made by the Armed Forces of the United States under such contracts shall be de-
posited in a designated account in the same manner that fees and  tuition payments for resident
students are deposited and credited.
Passed by Senate February 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 14, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 798 (SB 798-INTRO) Page 2